Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 432 Offenses Against the State and Public Justice

432.010.
Treason. [Repealed.]

432.020.
Criminal syndicalism. [Repealed.]

432.030.
Sedition. [Repealed.]

432.040.
Teaching, publishing, joining society to advocate criminal syndicalism or sedition. [Repealed.]

432.050.
Permitting assembly — Furnishing printing press or machinery for criminal syndicalism, sedition. [Repealed.]

432.060.
Conspiracy to commit sedition, criminal syndicalism — Proof. [Repealed.]

432.070.
Witness required to give self-incriminating testimony not to be prosecuted — Corroboration requirement not applicable. [Repealed.]

432.080.
Possession of firearms or explosives by subject of enemy country — Arrest and search. [Repealed.]

432.090.
Discrimination against person in uniform. [Repealed.]

432.100.
Forging or counterfeiting public documents, seals. [Repealed.]

432.110.
Fraudulently altering enrolled bill. [Repealed.]

432.120.
Forging names on petition, memorial, remonstrance.

Any person who signs any name to a petition, memorial or remonstrance intended for presentation to the General Assembly, a county judge/executive or the Governor, without authority from the person whose name is signed or where there is no such person, shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

1345: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 531, effective June 17, 1978.

432.130.
Withdrawal or mutilation of court record. [Repealed.]

432.140.
Forging, altering or stealing land warrant. [Repealed.]

432.150.
Removing or defacing legal advertisement. [Repealed.]

432.160.
False statement of notary public. [Repealed.]

432.170.
False swearing. [Repealed.]

432.180.
Subornation of perjury. [Repealed.]

432.190.
Commonwealth’s attorney receiving bribe not to prosecute. [Repealed.]

432.200.
Informer or prosecutor bribed to withhold evidence. [Repealed.]

432.210.
Appointment of attorney to prosecute person accused. [Repealed.]

432.215.
Threatening witness, juror or judicial officer. [Repealed.]

432.220.
Procuring juror to accept bribe. [Repealed.]

432.230.
Contempt of court by witness, juror, officer.

Witnesses, jurors and officers of courts, for disobeying a summons of court, or neglecting to execute or make due return of a subpoena or order of court or other judicial officer, may be punished for contempt.

History.

1293: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 442, effective January 2, 1978.

432.240.
No contempt for criticism out of court.

No court or judge shall proceed by process of contempt or impose a fine against any person who animadverts upon or examines into the proceedings or conduct of such court or judge, by words spoken or writing published, not in the presence of the court or judge in the courthouse during the sitting of the court.

History.

1295.

432.250.
Bond for appearance following contempt charge.

Upon a capias or other original process against a person charged with a contempt, the court awarding it shall direct in what penalty the accused shall give bond, with good surety, for his appearance at the time and place named in the process, which order shall be endorsed on the process. If the bond given is violated, proceedings shall be instituted by the attorney for the Commonwealth to recover the penalty.

If the person arrested by virtue of the process fails to give bond as required, the officer making the arrest shall forthwith remove and lodge him in the jail of the county from which the process issued.

History.

1297, 1298.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book 5th Ed., Practice Content for Contempt, § 22.00.

432.260.
Limit of penalty for contempt — Removal of officer exceeding limit. [Repealed.]

432.270.
No bail permitted for contempt.

A person committed to prison for contempt shall not be admitted to bail.

History.

1296.

432.280.
Court may bring criminal action for libel or slander — Punish resistance to judicial order.

Nothing in KRS

432.230

to

432.270

shall prevent any court or judge from proceeding against any person writing or publishing a libel or slanderous words concerning such court or judge in relation to his judicial conduct in court by indictment, nor prevent any court from punishing any person guilty of a contempt in resisting or disobeying any judicial order or process issued by or under the authority of such court.

History.

1299.

432.290.
Evidence in contempt trial by jury.

In all trials by jury arising under KRS

432.230

to

432.280

, the truth of the matter may be given in evidence.

History.

1292.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Elder, Kentucky Criminal Libel Law and Public Officials — An Historical Anachronism, 8 N. Ky. L. Rev. 37 (1981).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Upon Return of Warrant of Arrest and Trial for the Contempt, Form 22.07.

432.300.
Forcibly entering courtroom — Obstructing justice. [Repealed.]

432.310.
Judge failing to give place to special judge — Using money held by court. [Repealed.]

432.320.
Usurpation of office — Retention after expiration of term. [Repealed.]

432.330.
Promise to sell or purchase public office. [Repealed.]

432.340.
Taking a fee to procure grant or refusal of pardon. [Repealed.]

432.350.
Giving and taking bribes.

Any member of the General Assembly or any other executive, judicial, ministerial or legislative officer of this state or of any county or city, including members of boards of education and subdistrict trustees, who takes or agrees to take any bribe to do or omit to do any act in his official capacity shall forfeit his office and be disqualified from the right of suffrage for ten (10) years.

History.

1366: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 406, § 317.

432.360.
Officer issuing warrant in felony case without affidavit, information or personal knowledge. [Repealed.]

432.361.
Failure to appear on bail bond. [Repealed.]

432.365.
Assault of prison employee by a prisoner — Confinement of prisoners accused of violation. [Repealed.]

432.370.
Escape of prisoner from jail. [Repealed.]

432.380.
Escape of prisoner engaged in county work. [Repealed.]

432.390.
Escape of convict from penitentiary or custody — Attempt — Within penitentiary or aiding another — Jurisdiction of courts. [Repealed.]

432.400.
Aiding another to escape from jail or custody. [Repealed.]

432.410.
Aiding another to escape from a penal institution of a city of the first class — Harboring or concealing him. [Repealed.]

432.420.
Harboring or concealing fugitive — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

432.430.
Aiding or inducing a convict to escape from a penitentiary. [Repealed.]

432.440.
Interfering with recapture of fugitive from penitentiary. [Repealed.]

432.445.
Resisting arrest — Offense defined — Penalty. [Repealed.]

432.450.
Unlawfully arresting prisoner from authorities. [Repealed.]

432.460.
Officer negligently permitting escape — Wilfully refusing to receive prisoner. [Repealed.]

432.470.
Officer voluntarily permitting escape of felon. [Repealed.]

432.480.
Enticing boy or girl away from house of reform. [Repealed.]

432.490.
Aiding escape from state institution for insane or feebleminded — Jurisdiction.
[Renumbered KRS 210.995.]

432.495.
Trafficking with prison inmates. [Repealed.]

432.500.
Hindering work of convicts — Furnishing narcotics, liquor, firearms — Exceptions as to physicians. [Repealed.]

432.505.
Rioting or damaging of penitentiary property by inmate — Holding hostage. [Repealed.]

432.510.
Protection of prisoners — Power of officer to summon citizens, arm prisoners.

Any person having custody of a person charged with a public offense shall summon to his aid as many of the able-bodied male citizens of his county between the ages of twenty-one (21) and fifty (50) years as may be necessary for the protection of the person in his custody. Any person so summoned who fails to obey the summons or verbal notice of the officer shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any officer having knowledge or reasonable grounds to believe that an effort will be made to rescue, injure or kill any person in his custody charged with a public offense shall immediately provide the means necessary to prevent such an act.

Any officer in charge of a jail who has reasonable grounds to believe that the jail will be attacked by a mob or persons confederated or banded together to inflict violence upon any inmate, may arm the threatened inmates for their own protection.

History.

1241a-4.

432.520.
Witness may be required to testify in prosecution under KRS 432.510 — Immunity.

In any prosecution under KRS

432.510

, no witness shall be excused from testifying on the ground that his testimony may incriminate himself. But, no such testimony shall be used against him in any prosecution except for perjury, and he shall be discharged from all liability for any violation of KRS

432.510

necessarily disclosed in his testimony.

History.

1241a-7.

432.530.
Failure to come to aid of sheriff. [Repealed.]

432.540.
Employment of person under sentence in another state. [Repealed.]

432.550.
Bringing armed person into state to preserve peace or suppress violence.

No person shall, except with the consent of the General Assembly or of the Governor when the General Assembly is not in session, bring or cause to be brought into this state any armed person, not a citizen of this state, to preserve the peace, suppress domestic violence or to serve as a deputy of any officer or as a member of a posse comitatus, nor shall any officer knowingly summon any such person or any other person who has come into the state for that purpose to aid in suppressing violence. Any person who violates this section shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned for not less than six (6) nor more than twelve (12) months, or both.

History.

1376.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Armed persons not to be brought into the state except on application of General Assembly or governor, Const., § 225.

432.560.
Bringing pauper into state or county. [Repealed.]

432.570.
Restrictions on possession or use of radio capable of sending or receiving police messages — Penalty — Enforcement.

It shall be unlawful for any person except a member of a police department or police force or an official with written authorization from the head of a department which regularly maintains a police radio system authorized or licensed by the Federal Communications Commission, to have in his or her possession, or in an automobile or other vehicle, or to equip or install in or on any automobile or other vehicle, any mobile radio set or apparatus capable of either receiving or transmitting radio or other messages or signals within the wave length or channel now or which may hereafter be allocated by the Federal Communications Commission, or its successor, for the purpose of police radios, or which may in any way intercept or interfere with the transmission of radio messages by any police or other peace officers. It shall be unlawful for any car, automobile, or other vehicle other than one publicly owned and entitled to an official license plate issued by the state issuing a license for the car, to have, or be equipped with the sets or apparatus even though the car is owned by an officer. This section shall not apply to any automobile or vehicle owned or operated by a member of a sheriff’s department authorized by the fiscal court to operate a radio communications system that is licensed by the Federal Communications Commission or other federal agency having the authority to license same. Nothing in this section shall preclude a probation and parole officer employed by the Department of Corrections from carrying on his person or in a private vehicle while conducting his official duties an authorized, state-issued portable radio apparatus capable of transmitting or receiving signals.

Any person guilty of violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment not exceeding twelve (12) months, or both so fined and imprisoned.

It shall be the duty of any and all peace officers to seize and hold for evidence any and all equipment had or used in violation of the provisions of this section, and, upon conviction of the person having, equipping or using such equipment, it shall be the duty of the trial court to order such equipment or apparatus destroyed, forfeited, or escheated to the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and said property may be ordered destroyed, forfeited, or escheated as above provided without a conviction of the person charged with violating this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the possession of a radio by:

An individual who is a retailer or wholesaler and in the ordinary course of his business offers such radios for sale or resale;

A commercial or educational radio or television station, licensed by the Federal Communications Commission, at its place of business; or

An individual who possesses such a radio, provided it is capable of receiving radio transmissions only and is not capable of sending or transmitting radio messages, at his place of residence; licensed commercial auto towing trucks; newspaper reporters and photographers; emergency management agency personnel authorized in writing by the director of the division of emergency management (for state personnel) or chief executive of the city or county (for their respective personnel); a person holding a valid license issued by the Federal Communications Commission in the amateur radio service; peace officers authorized in writing by the head of their law enforcement agency, Commonwealth’s attorneys and their assistants, county attorneys and their assistants, except that it shall be unlawful to use such radio to facilitate any criminal activity or to avoid apprehension by law enforcement officers. Violation of this section shall, in addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, result in a forfeiture to the local law enforcement agency of such radio.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a paid or volunteer member of a fire department or a paid or volunteer member of a public ambulance service licensed in Kentucky who has been given permission in writing by the chief of the fire department and the chief of each law enforcement agency whose frequency is to be monitored, or the director of the ambulance service and the chief of each law enforcement agency whose frequency is to be monitored, to possess a radio capable of receiving on a frequency allocated to a police department or law enforcement agency, whether the radio is in a vehicle or not.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet is hereby empowered by issuance of a secretary’s order to exempt from the prohibitions and penalties of this section the possession and use of any and all radio communication equipment that he finds is necessary to be owned and used by members of the general public and other nonpolice persons for utilization in the N.O.A.A. weather radio system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 66, § 1; 1976, ch. 166, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 443, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 435, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 137, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 110, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 418, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 226, § 111, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

All private cars, including those of peace officers, are prohibited from being equipped with any radio or other apparatus which is capable of either receiving or transmitting messages within the wave length or channel allocated for the purposes of police radios.

OAG 66-495

.

Members of an organization known as REACT whose vehicles are equipped with radios capable of receiving police calls would be in violation of this section.

OAG 70-368

.

The possession and use of a mobile radio set in a constable’s car with the transmitter and receiver on a police frequency relating to the communications system of the local city police would make the constable subject to the application of this section.

OAG 71-281

.

Sheriffs of Kentucky and their deputies may use mobile radio communication equipment in their privately-owned vehicles in connection with their law enforcement and official duties, which equipment has been purchased by a fiscal court pursuant to KRS

70.210

without violating subsection (1) of this section.

OAG 71-494

.

It is immaterial whether or not a radio set in an automobile is connected.

OAG 72-817

.

Where the owner of a filling station who repairs police cars may have such cars for several days during servicing and the city has installed a police radio system in the owner’s private car for convenience, such installation is illegal and his appointment as a special policeman or auxiliary policeman would not cure such illegality.

OAG 73-690

.

Since the word “person” under subsection (21) (now subsection (27)) of KRS

446.010

may include a corporation unless the context requires otherwise and since this section provides for an alternative punishment of fine or jail time, a corporation can come within the meaning of “person” as such word is used in this section.

OAG 74-888

.

The term “capable” as used in the first sentence of subsection (1) of this section would include a radio set that may be converted by various simple adjustments to receive police broadcasts.

OAG 74-888

.

The term “mobile” does not exclude a radio set utilized in an abode, regardless of the source of power or method of installation.

OAG 74-888

.

Under KRS

189.950

and this section, the fiscal court does not have the authority to permit county auxiliary policemen to install flashing blue lights or police radios on their cars.

OAG 75-500

.

Possession of radios capable of monitoring or transmitting police frequencies is illegal, and this includes merchants unless they only repair for or sell such radios to authorized individuals.

OAG 76-10

.

As used in subsection (1) of this section in the phrase “any mobile radio set or apparatus” the term “mobile” modifies “radio set” only, not “apparatus” and thus the use or possession of any radio device or equipment, whether it be mobile or stationary, capable of intercepting or interfering with the wave length or channel assigned to the police by the F.C.C. is prohibited.

OAG 76-92

.

A radio station can legally put a scanner that would receive only police broadcasts and not transmit in a mobile unit.

OAG 78-384

.

The phrase “newspaper reporters and photographers” used in this section is broad enough to include news reporters of the entire news media, i.e., television, radio, newspapers and magazines, since if the exception were narrowly restricted to newspaper reporters, it would be unconstitutional, since it would be arbitrary.

OAG 78-384

.

The use of police scanners in the “private automobiles” owned by official or professional members of the news media is legal under the statute in question.

OAG 78-608

.

This section is impermissibly vague as applied to radar detectors because it does not adequately connote or embrace the use of radar detectors within the existing prohibition protecting the effectiveness of essential police radio communications.

OAG 79-154

.

The chief of a fire department has no authority to permit fire fighters within his department and under his command to install radios in their private vehicles for use in the performance of their official duties if those radios are capable of receiving or transmitting police messages. Only those persons and organizations who can bring themselves within the exemptions and exceptions set forth in this section are permitted to use or possess such radios.

OAG 82-126

.

A city police department is not required on the basis of subsections (1) to (4) of this section to authorize constables to use a radio system operating on a frequency licensed to the city or its police department for police use, or to provide to constables, radio dispatching and information support services.

OAG 95-20

.

432.580.
Unauthorized possession or use of federal food or cotton stamps. [Repealed.]

432.590.
Diversion of state or federally donated food commodities.

Whoever willfully sells, trades, barters, gives away or makes, or assists in making any unauthorized disposition of any food commodity donated under any program of the state or federal government, or shall withhold or threaten to withhold from or offer to provide the commodities to any person in order to influence the vote of any person at an election of public office, or whoever, not being an authorized recipient thereof, willfully converts to his own use or benefit any such food commodity, shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than $100 or more than $500, or by imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days or more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 38, § 1.